dictsource/yi_rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded 
// Spelling to phoneme rules for Yiddish


.replace


.group א
       א        ?
       אַ        a
       אַי        ai
       אֵ        e
       אֶ        e
       אֶי        ei
       אְ        ?
       אִ        i
       אוֹ        o
       אוֹי        oi
       אי        i
       אוּ        u
       אוּי        ui
       אָ        o
       אָ        a

.group ב
       ב        v
       בַ        va
       בֵ        ve
       בֶ        ve
       בְ        v
       בִ        vi
       בוֹ        vo
       בי        vi
       בוּ        vu
       בׇ        vo
       בָ        va
       בּ        b
       בַּ        ba
       בֵּ        be
       בֶּ        be
       בְּ        b
       בִּ        bi
       בּוֹ        bo
       בּי        bi
       בּוּ        bu
       בׇּ        bo
       בָּ        ba

.group ג
       ג        g
       גַ        ga
       גֵ        ge
       גֶ        ge
       גְ        g
       גִ        gi
       גוֹ        go
       גי        gi
       גוּ        gu
       גׇ        go
       גָ        ga
       ג'        dZ
       גַ'        dZa
       גֵ'        dZe
       גֶ'        dZe
       גְ'        dZ
       גִ'        dZi
       ג'וֹ        dZo
       ג'י        dZi
       ג'וּ        dZu
       גׇ'       dZo
       גָ'       dZa

.group ד
       ד        d
       דַ        da
       דֵ        de
       דֶ        de
       דְ        d
       דִ        di
       דוֹ        do
       די        di
       דוּ        du
       דׇ        do
       דָ        da
       דּ        d
       ד'        D
       דַ'        Da
       דֵ'        De
       דֶ'        De
       דְ'        D
       דִ'        Di
       ד'וֹ        Do
       ד'י        Di
       ד'וּ        Du
       דׇ'        Do
       דָ'        Da

.group ה
       ה        ?
       הַ        a
       הֵ        e
       הֶ        e
       הְ        h
       הִ        i
       הוֹ        o
       הי        i
       הוּ        u
       הׇ        o
       הָ        a

.group ו
       ו        v
       וּ        u
       _)וּ        u
       וֹ        o
       _) וֹ        o
       וו        w

.group ז
       ז        z
       זַ        za
       זֵ        ze
       זֶ        ze
       זְ        z
       זִ        zi
       זוֹ        zo
       זי        zi
       זוּ        zu
       זׇ        zo
       זָ        za
       ז'        Z
       זַ'        Za
       זֵ'        Ze
       זֶ'        Ze
       זְ'        Z
       זִ'        Zi
       ז'וֹ        Zo
       ז'י        Zi
       ז'וּ        Zu
       זׇ'        Zo
       זָ'        Za

.group ח
       ח        X
       חַ        aX
       חֵ        Xe
       חֶ        Xe
       חְ        X
       חִ        Xi
       חוֹ        Xo
       חי        Xi
       חוּ        Xu
       חׇ        Xo
       חָ        Xa

.group ט
       ט        t
       טַ        ta
       טֵ        te
       טֶ        te
       טְ        t
       טִ        ti
       טוֹ        to
       טי        ti
       טוּ        tu
       טׇ        to
       טָ        ta

.group י
       י        j
       יִ        i
       יוּ        ju

.group כ
       כ        x2
       כַ        x2a
       כֵ        x2e
       כֶ        x2e
       כְ        x2
       כִ        x2i
       כוֹ        x2o
       כי        x2i
       כוּ        x2u
       כׇ        x2o
       כָ        X2a
       כּ        k
       כַּ        ka
       כֵּ        ke
       כֶּ        ke
       כְּ        k
       כִּ        ki
       כּוֹ        ko
       כּי        ki
       כּוּ        ku
       כׇּ        ko
       כָּ        ka

.group ך
       ך        x2
       ךָ        x2a
       ךְ        x2

.group ל
       ל        l
       לַ        la
       לֵ        le
       לֶ        le
       לְ        l
       לִ        li
       לוֹ        lo
       לי        li
       לוּ        lu
       לׇ        lo
       לָ        la

.group מ
       מ        m
       מַ        ma
       מֵ        me
       מֶ        me
       מְ        m
       מִ        mi
       מוֹ        mo
       מי        mi
       מוּ        mu
       מׇ        mo
       מָ        ma

.group ם
       ם        m

.group נ
       נ        n
       נַ        na
       נֵ        ne
       נֶ        ne
       נְ        n
       נִ        ni
       נוֹ        no
       ני        ni
       נוּ        nu
       נׇ        no
       נָ        na
       נג        N

.group ן
       ן        n

.group ס
       ס        s
       סַ        sa
       סֵ        se
       סֶ        se
       סְ        s
       סִ        si
       סוֹ        so
       סי        si
       סוּ        su
       סׇ        so
       סָ        sa

.group ע
       ע        ?
       עַ        aa
       עַי        ai
       עֵ        e
       עֶ        e
       עֶי        ei
       עְ        ?
       עִ        i
       עוֹ        o
       עוֹי        oi
       עי        i
       עוּ        u
       עוּי        ui
       עָ        o
       עָ        a

.group פ
       פ        f
       פַ        fa
       פֵ        fe
       פֶ        fe
       פְ        f
       פִ        fi
       פוֹ        fo
       פי        fi
       פוּ        fu
       פׇ        fo
       פָ        fa
       פּ        p
       פַּ        pa
       פֵּ        pe
       פֶּ        pe
       פְּ        p
       פִּ        pi
       פּוֹ        po
       פּי        pi
       פּוּ        pu
       פׇּ        po
       פָּ        pa

.group ף
       ף        f

.group צ
       צ        ts
       צַ        tsa
       צֵ        tse
       צֶ        tse
       צְ        ts
       צִ        tsi
       צוֹ        tso
       צי        tsi
       צוּ        tsu
       צׇ        tso
       צָ        tsa
       צ'        tS
       צַ'        tSa
       צֵ'        tSe
       צֶ'        tSe
       צְ'        tS
       צִ'        tSi
       צ'וֹ        tSo
       צ'י        tSi
       צ'וּ        tSu
       צׇ'        tSo
       צָ'        tSa

.group ץ
       ץ        ts
       ץ'        tS

.group ק
       ק        k
       קַ        ka
       קֵ        ke
       קֶ        ke
       קְ        k
       קִ        ki
       קוֹ        ko
       קי        ki
       קוּ        ku
       קׇ        ko
       קָ        ka

.group ר
       ר        Q"
       רַ        Q"a
       רֵ        Q"e
       רֶ        Q"e
       רְ        Q"
       רִ        Q"i
       רוֹ        Q"o
       רי        Q"i
       רוּ        Q"u
       רׇ        Q"o
       רָ        Q"a

.group ש
       ש        S
       שׁ        S
       שַׁ        Sa
       שֵׁ        Se
       שֶׁ        Se
       שְׁ        S
       שִׁ        Si
       שׁוֹ        So
       שׁי        Si
       שׁוּ        Su
       שׇׁ        So
       שָׁ        Sa
       שׂ        s
       שַׂ        sa
       שֵׂ        se
       שֶׂ        se
       שְׂ        s
       שִׂ        si
       שׂוֹ        so
       שׂי        si
       שׂוּ        su
       שׇׂ        so
       שָׂ        sa

.group ת
       ת        t
       תַ        ta
       תֵ        te
       תֶ        te
       תְ        t
       תִ        ti
       תוֹ        to
       תי        ti
       תוּ        tu
       תׇ        to
       תָ        ta
       תּ        t
       ת'        T
       תַ'        Ta
       תֵ'        Te
       תֶ'        Te
       תְ'        T
       תִ'        Ti
       ת'וֹ        To
       ת'י        Ti
       ת'וּ        Tu
       תׇ'        To
       תָ'        Ta

.group ׇ
	ׇ	o


.group ָ
	ָ	a


.group ַ
	ַ	a


.group ֵ
	ֵ	e


.group ֶ
	ֶ	e


.group ְ
	ְ	


.group ִ
	ִ	i

.group ֳ
	ֳ	a

.group ֲ
	ֲ	a

.group ֻ
	ֻ	u
